Louisiana, session 2026, HB815.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:41(C)(1)(k) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§41. Disclosure of records
* * *
C.(1) The state registrar shall not permit inspection of the records or issue
a certificate, or any part thereof, unless he is satisfied that the applicant is any of the
following:
* * *
(k) A federally insured bank or federally insured credit union, or its duly
authorized agent.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.